Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3811.01
(UTC 112) Rules of construction.

(UTC 112) The rules of construction that apply in this state to the interpretation and disposition of property by will shall also apply as appropriate to the interpretation of the terms of a trust and the disposition of the trust property.

Laws 2026, LB838, § 23.
July 18, 2026